Maine, session 132, LD274.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Budget - Bureau of the 0055
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $143,429 $149,203
All Other $9,073 $9,073
__________ __________
Page 1 - 132LR2411(08)

HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $152,502 $158,276
BUDGET - BUREAU OF THE 0055
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $143,429 $149,203
All Other $9,073 $9,073
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $152,502 $158,276
Buildings and Grounds Operations 0080
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Personal Services $660,278 $700,912
All Other $1,609,800 $1,609,800
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $2,270,078 $2,310,712
Buildings and Grounds Operations 0080
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $39 $39
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $39 $39
Buildings and Grounds Operations 0080
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,111 $4,782
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $3,111 $4,782
BUILDINGS AND GROUNDS OPERATIONS 0080
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Personal Services $660,278 $700,912
All Other $1,612,950 $1,614,621
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $2,273,228 $2,315,533
Claims Board 0097
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 2 - 132LR2411(08)

HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $69,934 $72,532
All Other $18,344 $18,344
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $88,278 $90,876
Claims Board 0097
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,341 $1,649
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $1,341 $1,649
CLAIMS BOARD 0097
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $69,934 $72,532
All Other $19,685 $19,993
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $89,619 $92,525
Departments and Agencies - Statewide 0016
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $272,075 $272,075
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $272,075 $272,075
Departments and Agencies - Statewide 0016
Initiative: Deallocates funds included in the baseline budget as a placeholder to record
funding adjustments that are subsequently reallocated to the appropriate programs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($272,075) ($272,075)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL ($272,075) ($272,075)
DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES - STATEWIDE 0016
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Revenue Services, Bureau of 0002
Page 3 - 132LR2411(08)

Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $648,928 $682,759
All Other $32,095 $32,095
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $681,023 $714,854
REVENUE SERVICES, BUREAU OF 0002
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $648,928 $682,759
All Other $32,095 $32,095
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $681,023 $714,854
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL
SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $3,196,372 $3,281,188
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $3,196,372 $3,281,188
Sec. A-2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, DEPARTMENT OF
Air Quality 0250
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $33,816 $33,816
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $33,816 $33,816
Air Quality 0250
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $246 $589
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $246 $589
AIR QUALITY 0250
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 4 - 132LR2411(08)

HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $34,062 $34,405
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $34,062 $34,405
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $34,062 $34,405
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $34,062 $34,405
Sec. A-3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LEGISLATURE
Legislature 0081
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,575 $3,575
All Other $4,550 $4,550
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $8,125 $8,125
Legislature 0081
Initiative: Reduces funding to remove the baseline budget that is no longer needed.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($3,575) ($3,575)
All Other ($4,550) ($4,550)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL ($8,125) ($8,125)
LEGISLATURE 0081
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 $0
All Other $0 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $0
LEGISLATURE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $0 $0
__________ __________
Page 5 - 132LR2411(08)

DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $0
Sec. A-4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Public Safety 0088
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $172,058 $181,112
All Other $855,943 $855,943
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $1,028,001 $1,037,055
Administration - Public Safety 0088
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $400,000 $400,000
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $400,000 $400,000
ADMINISTRATION - PUBLIC SAFETY 0088
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $172,058 $181,112
All Other $1,255,943 $1,255,943
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $1,428,001 $1,437,055
Highway Safety DPS 0457
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $96,486 $103,764
All Other $580,436 $580,436
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $676,922 $684,200
Highway Safety DPS 0457
Initiative: Reallocates the cost of one Contract Grant Manager position and one Director of
Bureau of Highway Safety position from 100% Federal Expenditures Fund to 50% Federal
Expenditures Fund and 50% Highway Fund.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 6 - 132LR2411(08)

Personal Services $158,377 $166,343
All Other $1,122 $1,179
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $159,499 $167,522
Highway Safety DPS 0457
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $52,321 $52,321
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $52,321 $52,321
HIGHWAY SAFETY DPS 0457
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $254,863 $270,107
All Other $633,879 $633,936
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $888,742 $904,043
Motor Vehicle Inspection 0329
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,194,704 $1,255,914
All Other $423,007 $423,009
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $1,617,711 $1,678,923
Motor Vehicle Inspection 0329
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $11,541 $11,541
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $11,541 $11,541
Motor Vehicle Inspection 0329
Initiative: Provides funding for the purchase of hybrid vehicles for the State Police
divisions governing turnpike enforcement, motor vehicle inspection, traffic safety and
commercial vehicle enforcement consistent with an established vehicle replacement
schedule.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $51,940 $51,940
__________ __________
Page 7 - 132LR2411(08)

HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $51,940 $51,940
MOTOR VEHICLE INSPECTION 0329
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,194,704 $1,255,914
All Other $434,548 $434,550
Capital Expenditures $51,940 $51,940
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $1,681,192 $1,742,404
State Police 0291
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $22,306,571 $23,306,137
All Other $7,757,960 $7,759,299
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $30,064,531 $31,065,436
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace 2 bomb suits for the State Police bomb
team.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $58,800 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $58,800 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the purchase of one forensic laser for latent
fingerprints.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $8,750 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $8,750 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the purchase of a marine sonar device.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $23,730 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $23,730 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the purchase of a throwable robot for the tactical
team.
Page 8 - 132LR2411(08)

HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $7,000 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $7,000 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace 25 handgun lights.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,625 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $2,625 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for a higher cost of fuel for State Police vehicles.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $249,178 $249,178
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $249,178 $249,178
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for 4 specialized digital cameras.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,696 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $5,696 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace 26 rifles.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,220 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $25,220 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace infrared lasers.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $35,170
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 $35,170
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to purchase 350 plate carriers.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $265,996 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $265,996 $0
Page 9 - 132LR2411(08)

State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to purchase 350 helmets.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $137,047 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $137,047 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace 2 ballistic shields.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $8,400 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $8,400 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace 10 sniper rifles.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $19,250 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $19,250 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace 25 ballistic vests.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $16,909 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $16,909 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace 8 40-millimeter launchers.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,120 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $7,120 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the purchase of an unmanned aerial vehicle that
can be linked to existing software.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $9,574 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $9,574 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the purchase of a 3-dimensional scanner upgrade.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 10 - 132LR2411(08)

Capital Expenditures $22,737 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $22,737 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to replace the roof at the K-9 office.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $10,500 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $10,500 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $218,295 $218,295
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $218,295 $218,295
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to resurface the parking lot and driveway at the Alfred
barracks.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $22,400 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $22,400 $0
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for increased debt service costs associated with the purchase
of State Police vehicles on a regular vehicle replacement schedule.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $462,224 $607,286
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $462,224 $607,286
State Police 0291
Initiative: Establishes one Behavioral Health Coordinator position and provides funding
for related All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $39,492 $42,565
All Other $1,942 $1,995
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $41,434 $44,560
State Police 0291
Initiative: Establishes one State Police Lieutenant position and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
Page 11 - 132LR2411(08)

HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $70,247 $75,298
All Other $10,924 $9,962
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $81,171 $85,260
State Police 0291
Initiative: Establishes 3 State Police Specialist positions and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $218,643 $233,233
All Other $23,447 $15,504
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $242,090 $248,737
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for increased dispatch costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $400,406 $400,406
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $400,406 $400,406
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for the Maine Information and Analysis Center software
contract.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $44,496 $44,496
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $44,496 $44,496
State Police 0291
Initiative: Establishes 2 State Police Detective Corporal positions and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $122,188 $131,362
All Other $9,721 $9,879
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $131,909 $141,241
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved range change of 9 Computer Forensic Analyst
positions from range 27 to range 28.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,071 $1,152
All Other $44 $47
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $1,115 $1,199
Page 12 - 132LR2411(08)

STATE POLICE 0291
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $22,758,212 $23,789,747
All Other $9,639,250 $9,351,517
Capital Expenditures $191,141 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $32,588,603 $33,141,264
State Police - Support 0981
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Personal Services $806,262 $857,665
All Other $11,915 $11,915
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $818,177 $869,580
State Police - Support 0981
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Office Associate II
position to an Office Specialist I position, retroactive to February 28, 2024.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,303 $5,742
All Other $91 $99
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $5,394 $5,841
STATE POLICE - SUPPORT 0981
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Personal Services $811,565 $863,407
All Other $12,006 $12,014
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $823,571 $875,421
Traffic Safety 0546
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $1,571,939 $1,634,192
All Other $330,500 $330,530
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $1,902,439 $1,964,722
Traffic Safety 0546
Page 13 - 132LR2411(08)

Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,308 $9,308
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $9,308 $9,308
Traffic Safety 0546
Initiative: Provides funding for the purchase of hybrid vehicles for the State Police
divisions governing turnpike enforcement, motor vehicle inspection, traffic safety and
commercial vehicle enforcement consistent with an established vehicle replacement
schedule.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $51,940 $51,940
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $51,940 $51,940
Traffic Safety 0546
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one State Police Specialist
position to a State Police Specialist Corporal position and related All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $13,670 $14,717
All Other $85 $85
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $13,755 $14,802
TRAFFIC SAFETY 0546
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $1,585,609 $1,648,909
All Other $339,893 $339,923
Capital Expenditures $51,940 $51,940
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $1,977,442 $2,040,772
Traffic Safety - Commercial Vehicle Enforcement 0715
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 43.000 43.000
Personal Services $6,872,146 $7,161,290
All Other $1,051,947 $1,052,182
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $7,924,093 $8,213,472
Traffic Safety - Commercial Vehicle Enforcement 0715
Page 14 - 132LR2411(08)

Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $30,583 $30,583
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $30,583 $30,583
Traffic Safety - Commercial Vehicle Enforcement 0715
Initiative: Provides funding for the purchase of hybrid vehicles for the State Police
divisions governing turnpike enforcement, motor vehicle inspection, traffic safety and
commercial vehicle enforcement consistent with an established vehicle replacement
schedule.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $267,120 $267,120
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $267,120 $267,120
TRAFFIC SAFETY - COMMERCIAL VEHICLE ENFORCEMENT 0715
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 43.000 43.000
Personal Services $6,872,146 $7,161,290
All Other $1,082,530 $1,082,765
Capital Expenditures $267,120 $267,120
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $8,221,796 $8,511,175
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $47,609,347 $48,652,134
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $47,609,347 $48,652,134
Sec. A-5. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 395.500 395.500
Personal Services $38,951,789 $41,504,106
All Other $16,824,956 $16,824,957
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $55,776,745 $58,329,063
Page 15 - 132LR2411(08)

Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for administrative and branch office updates for
ergonomic equipment, security cameras and accessibility improvements.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $260,823 $329,596
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $260,823 $329,596
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for interpretation of official documents.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $52,165 $52,165
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $52,165 $52,165
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for an additional security compliance assessment.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $208,658 $52,165
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $208,658 $52,165
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 2 Accounting Assistant
Technician positions to 2 Accounting Associate II positions and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,430 $8,031
All Other $452 $351
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $10,882 $8,382
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for increases in contract expenses for issuing driver's license
and state identification credentials.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $147,194 $663,622
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $147,194 $663,622
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for increases in vehicle lease expenses.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $99,546 $111,736
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $99,546 $111,736
Page 16 - 132LR2411(08)

Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for increases in building rent expenses.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $92,760 $100,099
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $92,760 $100,099
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for a customer relationship management platform for the
Bureau of Motor Vehicles contact center.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $89,210 $76,690
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $89,210 $76,690
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding to increase the hours of 3 part-time Customer Representative
Associate II - Motor Vehicle positions to 3 full-time Customer Representative Associate II
- Motor Vehicle positions and provides funding for related All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.500 1.500
Personal Services $103,171 $111,493
All Other $4,466 $4,827
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $107,637 $116,320
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service Manager
II position to a Public Service Manager III position and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $16,684 $19,227
All Other $722 $832
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $17,406 $20,059
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for an enforcement services radio communication system.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $13,563 $13,563
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $13,563 $13,563
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for increase in membership fees for the International
Registration Plan.
Page 17 - 132LR2411(08)

HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,492 $8,492
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $8,492 $8,492
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for additional software licenses.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $16,601 $16,601
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $16,601 $16,601
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for an address verification software program.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $64,684 $22,952
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $64,684 $22,952
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for server software upgrades.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $90,902 $90,902
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $90,902 $90,902
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for an anticipated increase in cloud-based data storage.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $45,070 $45,070
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $45,070 $45,070
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of 2 Senior Motor Vehicle
Section Manager positions to 2 Regional Motor Vehicle Service Manager positions and
provides funding for related All Other costs, retroactive to February 2024.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $256 $2,097
All Other $11 $91
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $267 $2,188
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for increased membership fees for the International Fuel Tax
Agreement.
Page 18 - 132LR2411(08)

HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,433 $10,433
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $10,433 $10,433
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for monitoring servers, applications and hardware and software
inventory.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,976 $7,976
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $7,976 $7,976
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 4 Hearings Examiner
positions to 4 Hearings Officer positions and provides funding for related All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $43,389 $46,007
All Other $1,898 $2,015
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $45,287 $48,022
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for increases in technology costs in accordance with
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology
rate structure.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $121,808 $121,808
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $121,808 $121,808
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for mobile unit operational expenses.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $96,141 $96,141
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $96,141 $96,141
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Assistant Motor Vehicle
Hearings Examiner position from range 18 to range 22 and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $25,528 $26,672
All Other $1,105 $1,155
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $26,633 $27,827
Page 19 - 132LR2411(08)

Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Establishes one Technical Support Specialist position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $128,582 $138,743
All Other $16,060 $9,092
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $144,642 $147,835
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 2 Inventory & Property
Associate I positions to 2 Office Associate II positions and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $9,667 $7,918
All Other $418 $347
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $10,085 $8,265
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the increase in postage-related expenses.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $388,523 $388,523
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $388,523 $388,523
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Driver License
Examiner position to a Driver License Examiner Training Specialist position and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $20,383 $21,382
All Other $882 $926
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $21,265 $22,308
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Secretary Specialist
position to a Public Service Coordinator I position and provides funding for related All
Other costs, retroactive to June 2024.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,974 $10,992
All Other $388 $476
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $9,362 $11,468
Page 20 - 132LR2411(08)

ADMINISTRATION - MOTOR VEHICLES 0077
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 398.000 398.000
Personal Services $39,318,853 $41,896,668
All Other $18,665,907 $19,053,603
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $57,984,760 $60,950,271
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $57,984,760 $60,950,271
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $57,984,760 $60,950,271
Sec. A-6. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration 0339
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 95.000 95.000
Personal Services $11,507,809 $11,758,503
All Other $4,522,196 $4,522,196
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $16,030,005 $16,280,699
Administration 0339
Initiative: Adjusts allocations for technology costs based on the rate schedules provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information
Technology.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,541,078 $1,530,968
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $1,541,078 $1,530,968
Administration 0339
Initiative: Provides funding to establish a conference account in accordance with the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 1550.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Page 21 - 132LR2411(08)

Administration 0339
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Manager II position to manage policy initiatives
at the state and federal level.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $188,009 $189,462
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $188,009 $189,462
ADMINISTRATION 0339
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 96.000 96.000
Personal Services $11,695,818 $11,947,965
All Other $6,063,274 $6,053,164
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $17,759,092 $18,001,129
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Callahan Mine Site Restoration Z007
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $740,000 $740,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $740,000 $740,000
CALLAHAN MINE SITE RESTORATION Z007
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $740,000 $740,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $740,000 $740,000
Charging Infrastructure Z317
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Page 22 - 132LR2411(08)

CHARGING INFRASTRUCTURE Z317
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Fleet Services 0347
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FLEET SERVICES FUND - DOT 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 25.000 25.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 126.125 126.125
Personal Services $14,407,700 $14,801,681
All Other $22,197,922 $22,197,922
__________ __________
FLEET SERVICES FUND - DOT TOTAL $36,605,622 $36,999,603
Fleet Services 0347
Initiative: Adjusts allocations for technology costs based on the rate schedules provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information
Technology.
FLEET SERVICES FUND - DOT 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($51,438) $486,294
__________ __________
FLEET SERVICES FUND - DOT TOTAL ($51,438) $486,294
Fleet Services 0347
Initiative: Eliminates 60 crew positions across programs to fund the reallocation of
positions to more accurately align with work assignments and funding.
FLEET SERVICES FUND - DOT 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($73,054) ($76,642)
__________ __________
FLEET SERVICES FUND - DOT TOTAL ($73,054) ($76,642)
FLEET SERVICES 0347
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FLEET SERVICES FUND - DOT 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.000 24.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 126.125 126.125
Personal Services $14,334,646 $14,725,039
All Other $22,146,484 $22,684,216
__________ __________
FLEET SERVICES FUND - DOT TOTAL $36,481,130 $37,409,255
Page 23 - 132LR2411(08)

Highway and Bridge Capital 0406
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 488.500 488.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 18.654 18.654
Personal Services $29,423,045 $30,063,046
All Other $17,445,259 $17,445,259
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $46,868,304 $47,508,305
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $32,379,322 $33,084,435
All Other $57,655,513 $57,655,513
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $90,034,835 $90,739,948
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,144,586 $3,215,219
All Other $4,589,564 $4,589,564
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $7,734,150 $7,804,783
Highway and Bridge Capital 0406
Initiative: Provides capital funding needed to achieve the prioritized capital goals set forth
in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 23, section 73, subsection 7.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $46,296,500 $45,578,949
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $46,296,500 $45,578,949
Highway and Bridge Capital 0406
Initiative: Provides funding for Capital Expenditures and All Other in various programs
within the Federal Expenditures Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $32,000,000 $32,000,000
Capital Expenditures $500,000,000 $500,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $532,000,000 $532,000,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $153,000,000 $175,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $153,000,000 $175,000,000
Highway and Bridge Capital 0406
Page 24 - 132LR2411(08)

Initiative: Adjusts allocations for technology costs based on the rate schedules provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information
Technology.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,122,891 $2,043,729
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $3,122,891 $2,043,729
Highway and Bridge Capital 0406
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for costs related to the delivery of capital projects that
are part of a cost-saving initiative, including the prepurchase of materials, the rental of
equipment and the increased use of consultants.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,000,000 $8,000,000
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $8,000,000 $8,000,000
Highway and Bridge Capital 0406
Initiative: Eliminates 60 crew positions across programs to fund the reallocation of
positions to more accurately align with work assignments and funding.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $2,994,227 $3,067,060
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $2,994,227 $3,067,060
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($3,309,338) ($3,387,601)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($3,309,338) ($3,387,601)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($21,047) ($21,152)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($21,047) ($21,152)
Highway and Bridge Capital 0406
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for All Other costs related to the delivery of capital
projects, including the pre-buying of materials and the increased use of consultants.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000,000 $5,000,000
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $5,000,000 $5,000,000
HIGHWAY AND BRIDGE CAPITAL 0406
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 25 - 132LR2411(08)

HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 488.500 488.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 18.654 18.654
Personal Services $32,417,272 $33,130,106
All Other $33,568,150 $32,488,988
Capital Expenditures $46,296,500 $45,578,949
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $112,281,922 $111,198,043
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $29,069,984 $29,696,834
All Other $89,655,513 $89,655,513
Capital Expenditures $500,000,000 $500,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $618,725,497 $619,352,347
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,123,539 $3,194,067
All Other $4,589,564 $4,589,564
Capital Expenditures $153,000,000 $175,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $160,713,103 $182,783,631
Highway Light Capital Z095
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,925,000 $2,925,000
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $2,925,000 $2,925,000
Highway Light Capital Z095
Initiative: Provides capital funding needed to achieve the prioritized capital goals set forth
in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 23, section 73, subsection 7.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $12,900,000 $11,621,524
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $12,900,000 $11,621,524
Highway Light Capital Z095
Initiative: Provides allocation to spend the returned cash available after the repayment of
bonds from the funds previously transferred to the Maine Municipal Bond Bank, TransCap
Trust Fund.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $20,524,578 $20,919,034
__________ __________
Page 26 - 132LR2411(08)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $20,524,578 $20,919,034
Highway Light Capital Z095
Initiative: Provides funding for projected Personal Services costs at a level to provide
approximately 700 miles of light capital paving per year, among other work, depending on
bid prices and the severity of winter weather.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,150,001 $3,150,001
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $3,150,001 $3,150,001
HIGHWAY LIGHT CAPITAL Z095
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,150,001 $3,150,001
All Other $2,925,000 $2,925,000
Capital Expenditures $12,900,000 $11,621,524
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $18,975,001 $17,696,525
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $20,524,578 $20,919,034
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $20,524,578 $20,919,034
Infrastructure Adaptation Fund Z318
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,500 $1,500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,500 $1,500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Infrastructure Adaptation Fund Z318
Initiative: Provides funding for engineering services performed by department staff for
infrastructure adaptation-focused projects for the biennium.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $528,521 $528,681
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $528,521 $528,681
Infrastructure Adaptation Fund Z318
Initiative: Provides funding in the Infrastructure Adaptation Fund program to allow the
receipt and expenditure of federal funds.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 27 - 132LR2411(08)

All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
INFRASTRUCTURE ADAPTATION FUND Z318
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $528,521 $528,681
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $528,521 $528,681
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,500 $1,500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,500 $1,500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Local Road Assistance Program 0337
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,343,795 $25,343,795
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $25,343,795 $25,343,795
Local Road Assistance Program 0337
Initiative: Provides capital funding needed to achieve the prioritized capital goals set forth
in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 23, section 73, subsection 7.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,433,663 $5,077,382
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $5,433,663 $5,077,382
LOCAL ROAD ASSISTANCE PROGRAM 0337
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $30,777,458 $30,421,177
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $30,777,458 $30,421,177
Maintenance and Operations 0330
Page 28 - 132LR2411(08)

Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 154.000 154.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 956.566 956.566
Personal Services $121,855,144 $125,103,984
All Other $99,058,763 $99,058,763
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $220,913,907 $224,162,747
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,071,203 $1,085,981
All Other $5,106,169 $5,106,169
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $6,177,372 $6,192,150
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,374,886 $1,374,886
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,374,886 $1,374,886
INDUSTRIAL DRIVE FACILITY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
INDUSTRIAL DRIVE FACILITY FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
Maintenance and Operations 0330
Initiative: Provides funding for the purchase of capital equipment to be used in the
maintenance of the transportation system.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $600,000 $600,000
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $600,000 $600,000
Maintenance and Operations 0330
Initiative: Adjusts allocations for technology costs based on the rate schedules provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information
Technology.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $603,977 $751,595
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $603,977 $751,595
Maintenance and Operations 0330
Page 29 - 132LR2411(08)

Initiative: Reduces funding to provide a one-time offset to a one-time increase in allocation
in the Highway and Bridge Capital program, and a part of the capital transportation funding
need for this biennium.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($10,999,956) ($11,003,286)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL ($10,999,956) ($11,003,286)
Maintenance and Operations 0330
Initiative: Eliminates 60 crew positions across programs to fund the reallocation of
positions to more accurately align with work assignments and funding.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (60.000) (60.000)
Personal Services ($5,424,728) ($5,579,606)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL ($5,424,728) ($5,579,606)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($627) ($587)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($627) ($587)
Maintenance and Operations 0330
Initiative: Provides funding to rehabilitate crew facilities.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,405,096 $2,486,615
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $2,405,096 $2,486,615
MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS 0330
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 154.000 154.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 896.566 896.566
Personal Services $105,430,460 $108,521,092
All Other $102,067,836 $102,296,973
Capital Expenditures $600,000 $600,000
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $208,098,296 $211,418,065
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,070,576 $1,085,394
All Other $5,106,169 $5,106,169
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $6,176,745 $6,191,563
Page 30 - 132LR2411(08)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,374,886 $1,374,886
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,374,886 $1,374,886
INDUSTRIAL DRIVE FACILITY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
INDUSTRIAL DRIVE FACILITY FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
Multimodal - Aviation 0294
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,585,782 $1,585,782
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,585,782 $1,585,782
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $252,575 $263,957
All Other $957,000 $957,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,209,575 $1,220,957
Multimodal - Aviation 0294
Initiative: Provides funding for Capital Expenditures in various programs within the
Federal Expenditures Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $300,000 $300,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $300,000 $300,000
Multimodal - Aviation 0294
Initiative: Eliminates 60 crew positions across programs to fund the reallocation of
positions to more accurately align with work assignments and funding.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $148,817 $153,682
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $148,817 $153,682
MULTIMODAL - AVIATION 0294
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 31 - 132LR2411(08)

All Other $1,585,782 $1,585,782
Capital Expenditures $300,000 $300,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,885,782 $1,885,782
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $401,392 $417,639
All Other $957,000 $957,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,358,392 $1,374,639
Multimodal - Freight Rail 0350
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $13,213 $13,217
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $113,213 $113,217
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $263,063 $263,803
All Other $1,467,904 $1,467,904
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,730,967 $1,731,707
Multimodal - Freight Rail 0350
Initiative: Provides funding for Capital Expenditures in various programs within the
Federal Expenditures Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $10,000,000 $10,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $10,000,000 $10,000,000
MULTIMODAL - FREIGHT RAIL 0350
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $13,213 $13,217
All Other $100,000 $100,000
Capital Expenditures $10,000,000 $10,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $10,113,213 $10,113,217
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 32 - 132LR2411(08)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $263,063 $263,803
All Other $1,467,904 $1,467,904
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,730,967 $1,731,707
Multimodal - Island Ferry Service Z016
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,602,896 $7,602,896
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $7,602,896 $7,602,896
ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 97.000 97.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 7.226 7.226
Personal Services $11,105,645 $11,295,714
All Other $5,015,701 $5,015,701
__________ __________
ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND TOTAL $16,121,346 $16,311,415
Multimodal - Island Ferry Service Z016
Initiative: Adjusts allocations for technology costs based on the rate schedules provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information
Technology.
ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $254,401 $391,299
__________ __________
ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND TOTAL $254,401 $391,299
Multimodal - Island Ferry Service Z016
Initiative: Provides funding to adjust state support to 50% of the operating cost of the Maine
State Ferry Service in accordance with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 23, section 4210-
C.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $496,352 $591,837
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $496,352 $591,837
Multimodal - Island Ferry Service Z016
Initiative: Eliminates 60 crew positions across programs to fund the reallocation of
positions to more accurately align with work assignments and funding.
ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $126,288 $132,198
__________ __________
Page 33 - 132LR2411(08)

ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND TOTAL $126,288 $132,198
Multimodal - Island Ferry Service Z016
Initiative: Continues and makes permanent the following limited-period positions
established by Financial Order 003718 F5: one Ferry Ordinary Seaman positions, 2 Ferry
Captain 100 Ton positions and one Ferry Engineer position.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $214,281 $224,942
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $214,281 $224,942
ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $428,561 $449,884
__________ __________
ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND TOTAL $428,561 $449,884
Multimodal - Island Ferry Service Z016
Initiative: Provides funding to increase the hours of existing positions that provide service
in the ferry terminals. Position detail is on file with the Bureau of the Budget.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $93,238 $93,760
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $93,238 $93,760
ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.500 3.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (1.759) (1.759)
Personal Services $186,476 $187,520
__________ __________
ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND TOTAL $186,476 $187,520
Multimodal - Island Ferry Service Z016
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to continue a contract for temporary services in order
to continue the operations of the Maine State Ferry Service.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $250,000
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $250,000 $250,000
ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
Page 34 - 132LR2411(08)

MULTIMODAL - ISLAND FERRY SERVICE Z016
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,656,767 $8,763,435
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $8,656,767 $8,763,435
ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 105.500 105.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 5.467 5.467
Personal Services $11,846,970 $12,065,316
All Other $5,770,102 $5,907,000
__________ __________
ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND TOTAL $17,617,072 $17,972,316
Multimodal - Passenger Rail Z139
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,800,000 $3,800,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,800,000 $3,800,000
MULTIMODAL - PASSENGER RAIL Z139
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,800,000 $3,800,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,800,000 $3,800,000
Multimodal - Ports and Marine 0323
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,650,000 $1,650,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,650,000 $1,650,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $329,297 $338,483
All Other $59,500 $59,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $388,797 $397,983
Multimodal - Ports and Marine 0323
Page 35 - 132LR2411(08)

Initiative: Provides funding for Capital Expenditures and reduces All Other in various
programs within the Federal Expenditures Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($1,200,000) ($1,200,000)
Capital Expenditures $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($1,150,000) ($1,150,000)
MULTIMODAL - PORTS AND MARINE 0323
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $450,000 $450,000
Capital Expenditures $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $329,297 $338,483
All Other $59,500 $59,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $388,797 $397,983
Multimodal - Transit 0443
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $423,640 $433,825
All Other $8,131,112 $8,131,112
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $8,554,752 $8,564,937
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $12,231 $12,304
All Other $1,395,665 $1,395,665
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,407,896 $1,407,969
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Page 36 - 132LR2411(08)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $500 $500
Multimodal - Transit 0443
Initiative: Provides funding for Capital Expenditures in various programs within the
Federal Expenditures Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $4,000,000 $4,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,000,000 $4,000,000
Multimodal - Transit 0443
Initiative: Eliminates 60 crew positions across programs to fund the reallocation of
positions to more accurately align with work assignments and funding.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($12,231) ($12,306)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($12,231) ($12,306)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $12,231 $12,306
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $12,231 $12,306
Multimodal - Transit 0443
Initiative: Transfers funding from the Multimodal Transportation Fund, Highway Fund
account to the Multimodal - Transit program, Highway Fund account.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000,000 $5,000,000
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $5,000,000 $5,000,000
MULTIMODAL - TRANSIT 0443
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000,000 $5,000,000
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $5,000,000 $5,000,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $411,409 $421,519
Page 37 - 132LR2411(08)

All Other $8,131,112 $8,131,112
Capital Expenditures $4,000,000 $4,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $12,542,521 $12,552,631
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $24,462 $24,610
All Other $1,395,665 $1,395,665
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,420,127 $1,420,275
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $500 $500
Multimodal Transportation Fund Z017
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000,000 $5,000,000
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $5,000,000 $5,000,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,209,519 $1,209,519
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,209,519 $1,209,519
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $454,029 $465,391
All Other $9,394,441 $9,394,441
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,848,470 $9,859,832
Page 38 - 132LR2411(08)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Multimodal Transportation Fund Z017
Initiative: Provides capital funding needed to achieve the prioritized capital goals set forth
in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 23, section 73, subsection 7.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $7,907,538 $4,985,328
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $7,907,538 $4,985,328
Multimodal Transportation Fund Z017
Initiative: Provides funding for Capital Expenditures in various programs within the
Federal Expenditures Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $42,000,000 $45,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $42,000,000 $45,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Fund Z017
Initiative: Eliminates 60 crew positions across programs to fund the reallocation of
positions to more accurately align with work assignments and funding.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services $149,797 $147,181
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $149,797 $147,181
Multimodal Transportation Fund Z017
Initiative: Provides funding for engineering services performed by department staff for
multimodal projects for the biennium.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $619,677 $633,359
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $619,677 $633,359
Multimodal Transportation Fund Z017
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,152,503 $768,314
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,152,503 $768,314
Page 39 - 132LR2411(08)

Multimodal Transportation Fund Z017
Initiative: Transfers funding from the Multimodal Transportation Fund, Highway Fund
account to the Multimodal - Transit program, Highway Fund account.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($5,000,000) ($5,000,000)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL ($5,000,000) ($5,000,000)
MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION FUND Z017
PROGRAM SUMMARY
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $0
Capital Expenditures $7,907,538 $4,985,328
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $7,907,538 $4,985,328
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,209,519 $1,209,519
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,209,519 $1,209,519
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $1,223,503 $1,245,931
All Other $10,546,944 $10,162,755
Capital Expenditures $42,000,000 $45,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $53,770,447 $56,408,686
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Receivables 0344
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $99,099 $99,129
All Other $912,121 $912,121
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,011,220 $1,011,250
RECEIVABLES 0344
Page 40 - 132LR2411(08)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $99,099 $99,129
All Other $912,121 $912,121
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,011,220 $1,011,250
State Infrastructure Bank 0870
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $150,000 $150,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $150,000 $150,000
STATE INFRASTRUCTURE BANK 0870
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $150,000 $150,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $150,000 $150,000
Supplemental Transportation Fund Z281
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,500 $100,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $100,500 $100,500
SUPPLEMENTAL TRANSPORTATION FUND Z281
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,500 $100,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $100,500 $100,500
Transportation Facilities Z010
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,000,000 $3,000,000
__________ __________
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES FUND TOTAL $3,000,000 $3,000,000
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES Z010
PROGRAM SUMMARY
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,000,000 $3,000,000
Page 41 - 132LR2411(08)

__________ __________
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES FUND TOTAL $3,000,000 $3,000,000
TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $409,456,074 $407,483,702
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $651,153,777 $651,805,559
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $247,612,038 $272,741,772
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $3,000 $3,000
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $500 $500
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES FUND $3,000,000 $3,000,000
FLEET SERVICES FUND - DOT $36,481,130 $37,409,255
INDUSTRIAL DRIVE FACILITY FUND $500,000 $500,000
ISLAND FERRY SERVICES FUND $17,617,072 $17,972,316
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $1,365,823,591 $1,390,916,104
PART B
Sec. B-1. 23 MRSA §1803-B, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2013, c. 354, Pt. I,
§2 and affected by §4, is further amended to read:
D. Beginning July 1, 2014, the The annual funding dedicated for the Local Road
Assistance Program must be 9% of the Highway Fund allocation to the Department of
Transportation for general construction and maintenance of highways and bridges. On
July 1, 2014 and every Annually, by July 1st thereafter, the Commissioner of
Transportation shall administratively adjust the base funding and the reimbursement
rates per lane mile proportionately according to revenue available.
PART C
Sec. C-1. Attrition savings. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
the attrition rate for the 2026-2027 biennium is increased from 1.6% to 5% for executive
branch departments and agencies only. The attrition rate for subsequent biennia is 1.6%.
Sec. C-2. Calculation and transfer. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the State Budget Officer shall calculate the amount of savings in this Part that
applies against each Highway Fund account for all departments and agencies from savings
associated with attrition in fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-27 and shall transfer
the amounts by financial order upon the approval of the Governor. These transfers are
considered adjustments to appropriations in fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-27.
The State Budget Officer shall provide a report of the transferred amounts to the Joint
Standing Committee on Appropriations and Financial Affairs no later than October 1, 2025.
Sec. C-3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Executive Branch Departments and Independent Agencies - Statewide 0017
Page 42 - 132LR2411(08)

Initiative: Reduces funding to reflect projected savings from an increase in the attrition rate
from 1.6% to 5% for fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($6,063,213) ($6,269,757)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL ($6,063,213) ($6,269,757)
PART D
Sec. D-1. Transfer of Highway Fund unallocated balance; capital program
needs; Department of Transportation. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 5, section 1585 or any other provision of law to the contrary, at the close of the fiscal
years 2025-26 and 2026-27 the State Controller shall transfer amounts exceeding $100,000
from the unallocated balance in the Highway Fund after the deduction of all allocations,
financial commitments, other designated funds and any other transfer authorized by statute
to the Department of Transportation Highway and Bridge Capital, Highway Light Capital,
Maintenance and Operations and multimodal transportation programs for capital or all
other needs. The Commissioner of Transportation is authorized to allot these funds by
financial order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and the approval of
the Governor. The transferred amounts are considered adjustments to allocations. Within
30 days of approval of the financial order, the Commissioner of Transportation shall
provide to the members of the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over transportation matters a report detailing the financial status of the
department's capital program.
PART E
Sec. E-1. Transfer authorized. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title
5, section 1585 or any other provision of law, for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026 and
June 30, 2027 the Commissioner of Transportation is authorized to transfer, by financial
order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor,
identified Highway Fund Personal Services savings to the Department of Transportation
Highway and Bridge Capital, Highway Light Capital, Maintenance and Operations and
multimodal transportation programs for capital or all other needs. The financial order must
identify the specific savings after all adjustments that may be required by the State
Controller to ensure that all financial commitments have been met in Personal Services
after assuming all costs for that program including collective bargaining costs. The
Commissioner of Transportation shall provide a report by September 15, 2026 and
September 15, 2027 to the members of the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over transportation matters detailing the financial adjustments to the
Highway Fund.
PART F
Sec. F-1. 29-A MRSA §453, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 216, §11, is
further amended to read:
2. Fee. The annual administrative fee for a vanity registration plate is $25 in addition
to the regular motor vehicle registration fee. The administrative fee must be credited to the
General Highway Fund, except that $10 of the administrative fee must be transferred on a
quarterly basis by the Treasurer of State to the TransCap Trust Fund established by Title
Page 43 - 132LR2411(08)

30‑A, section 6006‑G. A sum sufficient to defray the cost of this program must be allocated
annually from the General Highway Fund.
Sec. F-2. 29-A MRSA §501, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2015, c. 206, §4, is further
amended by amending the 6th blocked paragraph to read:
Beginning July 1, 2009 and ending June 30, 2025, $10 of the fee must be transferred on a
quarterly basis by the Treasurer of State to the TransCap Trust Fund established by Title
30‑A, section 6006‑G.
Sec. F-3. 29-A MRSA §504, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2007, c. 647, §3 and
affected by §8, is further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
Beginning July 1, 2009 and ending June 30, 2025, $10 of the fee must be transferred
on a quarterly basis by the Treasurer of State to the TransCap Trust Fund established
by Title 30‑A, section 6006‑G.
Sec. F-4. 29-A MRSA §603, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2007, c. 647, §4 and
affected by §8 and amended by c. 703, §§16 to 20, is further amended by amending the
first blocked paragraph to read:
Beginning July 1, 2009 and ending June 30, 2025, $10 of the fee must be transferred on a
quarterly basis by the Treasurer of State to the TransCap Trust Fund established by Title
30‑A, section 6006‑G.
Sec. F-5. 30-A MRSA §6006-G, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 239, §8, is
further amended to read:
1. Establishment; purposes. The TransCap Trust Fund, referred to in this section as
"the fund," is established in the custody of the bank to provide transportation capital
investment for the Department of Transportation and municipalities in accordance with this
section. The purpose of the fund is to provide financial assistance for the planning, design,
acquisition, reconstruction and rehabilitation of transportation capital improvements of all
modes including improvements that will forward the asset management goals set forth in
Title 23, section 73, subsection 7 and Title 23, section 4210-B, subsection 3.
Sec. F-6. 30-A MRSA §6006-G, sub-§2, ¶A, as amended by PL 2009, c. 652, Pt.
A, §43, is further amended to read:
A. Sums that are transferred to the fund from time to time by the Treasurer of State
pursuant to Title 36, section 2903, subsection 6 and; Title 36, section 3203, subsection
4; and Title 36, section 1821; and
Sec. F-7. 30-A MRSA §6006-G, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2009, c. 411, §1,
is repealed.
Sec. F-8. 36 MRSA §1821, 3rd ¶, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 189, Pt. I, §1, is
amended to read:
When notified by the assessor, the State Controller shall transfer 40% of the amount in
the notice, after the reduction for transfer to the Local Government Fund pursuant to Title
30‑A, section 5681, subsection 5, from the General Fund to the Highway Fund. The State
Controller shall transfer 22% of the amount transferred to the Highway Fund to the
TransCap Trust Fund established in Title 30-A, section 6006-G.
Page 44 - 132LR2411(08)

Sec. F-9. PL 2023, c. 189, Pt. F, §1 is amended to read:
Sec. F-1. Authorization to issue TransCap Trust Fund revenue bonds.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Maine Municipal Bond Bank, at
the request of the Department of Transportation, is authorized to issue TransCap Trust Fund
revenue bonds as provided in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 30-A, section 6006-G from
time to time in amounts that in total do not exceed $200,000,000 $250,000,000 from the
effective date of this Part through fiscal year 2024-25 2026-27 for the purpose of making
capital improvements to the State’s transportation infrastructure.
PART G
Sec. G-1. 23 MRSA §1652, first ¶, as amended by PL 2011, c. 392, Pt. L, §2, is
further amended to read:
Such unexpended Unexpended balances of the Highway Fund as that have been set up
for general construction and maintenance of highways and bridges and for purchasing,
operating, maintaining, improving, repairing, constructing and managing the assets of
multimodal forms of transportation, including, but not limited to, transit, aeronautics,
marine and rail, are deemed nonlapsing carrying accounts. All other unexpended balances
lapse into the Highway Fund at the end of each fiscal period year, but may not lapse or be
transferred to the General Fund in the State Treasury.
PART H
Sec. H-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Highway and Bridge Capital 0406
Initiative: Reduces Capital Expenditures funding related to an initiative included in Part A.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 ($2,000,000)
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $0 ($2,000,000)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $0 ($2,000,000)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 ($2,000,000)
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 45 - 132LR2411(08)